Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201887-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 87-801 to 87-808 shall be known and may be cited as the Financial Data Protection and Consumer Notification of Data Security Breach Act of 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB757, § 6.
July 19, 2018